Maryland, session 2026, SB0567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–310.
(a) For each individual who seeks to vote, an election judge, in accordance with
instructions provided by the local board, shall:
(1) locate the individual’s name in the election register and locate the
preprinted voting authority card and then [authorize the individual to vote a regular ballot]
ESTABLISH THE VOTER’S IDENTITY AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0567*

SENATE BILL 567
(2) (i) if the individual’s name is not found on the election register,
search the inactive list and if the name is found, [authorize the individual to vote a regular
ballot] ESTABLISH THE VOTER’S IDENTITY AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION; or
(ii) if the individual’s name is not on the inactive list, refer the
individual for provisional ballot voting under § 9–404 of this article[;].
[(3)] (B) THE ELECTION JUDGE SHALL establish the VOTER’S identity
[of the voter] by:
(1) requesting the voter to state the month and day of the voter’s birth and
comparing the response to the information listed in the election register;
(2) REQUIRING THE VOTER TO PRESENT:
(I) A VALID GOVERNMENT–ISSUED PHOTO IDENTIFICATION; OR
(II) 1. A VALID NON–GOVERNMENT–ISSUED PHOTO
IDENTIFICATION; AND
2. A CURRENT UTILITY BILL, BANK STATEMENT,
PAYCHECK, GOVERNMENT CHECK, OR OTHER GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT THAT
STATES THE VOTER’S NAME AND ADDRESS;
[(4)] (3) (i) except if a voter’s personal information has been deemed
confidential by the local board, verify the address of the voter’s residence; or
(ii) conduct an alternative verification as established by the State
Board, if the voter’s personal information has been deemed confidential by the local board;
[(5)] (4) if any changes to the voting authority card are indicated by a
voter, make the appropriate changes in information on the card or other appropriate form;
and
[(6)] (5) have the voter sign the voting authority card and either issue the
voter a ballot or send the voter to a machine to vote.
[(b)] (C) (1) [On] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION, ON the completion of the procedures set forth in [subsection (a)] SUBSECTIONS
(A) AND (B) of this section, [a] THE ELECTION JUDGE SHALL AUTHORIZE THE
INDIVIDUAL TO VOTE A REGULAR BALLOT.

SENATE BILL 567 3
(2) A voter may vote A REGULAR BALLOT in accordance with the
procedures appropriate to the voting system used in the polling place.
(D) THE ELECTION JUDGE SHALL REFER THE INDIVIDUAL FOR A
PROVISIONAL BALLOT UNDER § 9–404 OF THIS ARTICLE IF THE VOTER IS UNABLE TO
PROVIDE IDENTIFICATION AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS
SECTION.
[(c)] (E) (1) Before a voter enters a voting booth, at the request of the voter,
an election judge shall:
(i) instruct the voter about the operation of the voting system; and
(ii) allow the voter an opportunity to operate a model voting device,
if appropriate to the voting system in use.
(2) (i) 1. After a voter enters the voting booth, at the request of the
voter, two election judges representing different political parties shall instruct the voter on
the operation of the voting device.
2. An election judge may not suggest in any way how the
voter should vote for a particular ticket, candidate, or position on a question.
3. After instructing the voter, the election judges shall exit
the voting booth and allow the voter to vote privately.
(ii) A voter may take into the polling place any written or printed
material to assist the voter in marking or preparing the ballot.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a voter
who requires assistance in marking or preparing the ballot because of a physical disability
or an inability to read the English language may choose any individual to assist the voter.
(ii) A voter may not choose the voter’s employer or agent of that
employer or an officer or agent of the voter’s union to assist the voter in marking the ballot.
(4) If the voter requires the assistance of another in voting but declines to
select an individual to assist, an election judge, in the presence of another election judge
that represents another political party, shall assist the voter in the manner prescribed by
the voter.
(5) An individual assisting a voter may not suggest in any way how the
voter should vote for a particular ticket, candidate, or position on a question.
(6) If a voter requires assistance under paragraph (4) or (5) of this
subsection, the election judge shall record, on a form prescribed by the State Board, the

SENATE BILL 567
name of the voter who required assistance and the name of the individual providing
assistance to the voter.
(7) Except as provided in paragraph (3) or (4) of this subsection, an
individual over the age of 17 years may not accompany a voter into a voting booth.
16–201.
(a) In this section, “influence” includes the use of pressure, deception, trickery, or
direct or indirect authority to induce action or to change the decision or act of another,
regardless of the medium used.
(b) A person may not willfully and knowingly:
(1) (i) impersonate another person in order to vote or attempt to vote;
[or]
(ii) vote or attempt to vote under a false name; OR
(III) VOTE OR ATTEMPT TO VOTE UNDER A FALSE FORM OF
IDENTIFICATION;
(2) vote more than once for a candidate for the same office or for the same
ballot question;
(3) vote or attempt to vote more than once in the same election, or vote in
more than one election district or precinct;
(4) vote in an election district or precinct without the legal authority to vote
in that election district or precinct;
(5) influence or attempt to influence a voter’s voting decision through the
use of force, threat, menace, intimidation, bribery, reward, or offer of reward;
(6) influence or attempt to influence a voter’s decision, through the use of
force, fraud, threat, menace, intimidation, bribery, reward, or offer of reward, whether to:
(i) go to the polls to cast a vote; or
(ii) vote by other lawful means; or
(7) engage in conduct that results or has the intent to result in the denial
or abridgement of the right of any citizen of the United States to vote on account of race,
color, or disability.

SENATE BILL 567 5
(c) Except as provided in § 16–1002 of this title, a person who violates this section
is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine of not more than $5,000 or
imprisonment for not more than 5 years or both.
(d) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.